Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; THE COOKIE CART.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to The Cookie Cart for earn and learn workforce training for youth ages 14 to 18 by providing life, leadership, and employment skills through on-the-job and classroom experiences in a nonprofit bakery. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end